Utah statutes.
54-7-25.   Violations by utilities -- Penalty.
(1)  Any public utility that violates or fails to comply with this title or
any rule or order issued under this title, in a case in which a penalty is not
otherwise provided for that public utility, is subject to a penalty of not
less than $500 nor more than $2,000 for each offense.
(2)  Any violation of this title or any rule or order of the commission by any
corporation or person is a separate and distinct offense.  In the case of a
continuing violation, each day's continuance  of the violation shall be a
separate and distinct offense.
(3)  In construing and enforcing the provisions of this title relating to
penalties, the act, omission, or failure of any officer, agent, or employee of
any public utility acting within the scope of his official duties or
employment shall in each case be deemed to be the act, omission, or failure of
that public utility.
